Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-519
Protest petition; contents.

At any time after the filing of a petition for the organization of a reclamation district and not less than thirty days prior to the time fixed by the order of the Chief Water Officer for the hearing upon the petition, and not thereafter, a petition may be filed with the Chief Water Officer wherein the proceeding for the creation of the district is pending, signed by not fewer than the owners of thirty percent of the acreage of lands in the district, exclusive of land in cities and villages, who have not signed the petition for creating the district, protesting the creation of the district. The protesting petition shall list each tract or tracts of land and the total acreage of each signer opposite his or her name.

Laws 1947, c. 173, § 7(1), p. 529;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 156.